District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.22a

Sale of food by false advertising.

The Director of Weights, Measures, and Markets is further authorized to make purchases of food in connection with the investigation and detection of sales of food by misrepresentation or false advertising in violation of §§ 22-1511 to 22-1513; and there are authorized to be appropriated annually such sums as may be necessary for carrying out the purposes of this section.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1223, ch. 118, § 22 1/2
Apr. 27, 1945, 59 Stat. 99, ch. 99, § 5
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
1981 Ed., § 10-126.
1973 Ed., § 10-124a.
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.